Wyoming statutes. Title 28 Legislature
Chapter 12 Senate Confirmation of Gubernatorial Appointments

§ 28-12-101.
Appointments by governor; vacancies.

The governor shall submit to the senate the name, address and occupation of each person he proposes for appointment to public office and for which senate advice and consent is required under either the constitution or laws of this state. In addition and for those appointments for which political party affiliation is specified by law, the governor shall provide the senate with documentation of compliance with W.S. 9-1-218(e). The information required by this section shall be submitted to the senate by:

Noon on the thirtieth legislative working day during the general and budget session; and

Noon on the twelfth legislative working day during the budget session.

The governor may fill any vacancy occurring between sessions of the legislature by temporary appointment to be effective until March 1 of the ensuing calendar year.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 1; 1996, ch. 85, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2011, ch. 49 § 2, provides:

“(a)

The governor shall appoint one (1) person to serve as joint director of the department of employment and director of the department of workforce services from the effective date of this act until July 1, 2011. Thereafter the governor shall appoint a director of the department of workforce services by temporary appointment as provided in W.S. 28-12-101(b).

“(b)

The joint director shall plan for the transfer of all divisions, agencies, programs and functions from the department of employment to the department of workforce services, with the transfer to become effective on or before July 1, 2011.

“(c)

The transfer of programs and functions from the department of employment to the department of workforce services shall be deemed a type 1 transfer as defined in W.S. 9-2-1707(b)(i).

“(d)

To the extent practicable, the director shall provide that the public services of the former department of employment and the department of workforce services be provided at consolidated physical locations to maximize efficiency and convenience to the public. The director shall plan the local relocation or consolidation of any facilities to minimize the costs incurred due to the local relocation or consolidation.

“(e)

The director of the department of workforce services shall prepare a status report on the transfer of the department of employment divisions, programs and functions to the department of workforce services. The report shall be submitted to the governor, the joint appropriations interim committee, the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee and the joint labor, health and social services interim committee of the legislature no later than October 1, 2011 and made available to the public. The report shall include recommendations on the further consolidation of the former department of employment programs and functions, including recommended additional legislation to consolidate the merged departments. The joint labor, health and social services interim committee and the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee shall report to the legislature by January 31, 2012, any recommendations resulting from the department's report, including necessary legislation to further consolidate the former department of employment into the department of workforce services.”

Laws 2019, Ch. 34, § 5, states as follows: "The governor shall submit appointments to the Wyoming energy authority by the date specified in W.S. 28-12-101(a)(ii) during the 2020 budget session."

Stated

in

County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

§ 28-12-102.
Senate consideration of gubernatorial appointments; procedure; roll call vote required.

The senate, in a manner it determines, shall review the qualifications of each person whose name is submitted to it for consideration in accordance with W.S. 28-12-101(a).

After review of nominees in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, the senate, within five (5) legislative working days after submission by roll call vote, shall confirm or reject each gubernatorial nominee requiring the advice and consent of the senate.

If the senate does not consent to a nominee for a given office, the governor shall submit the name, address and biography of another person for senate consideration if the legislature is still in session. If the legislature has adjourned, the governor may make a temporary appointment as provided in W.S. 28-12-101(b). No person rejected by the senate shall be appointed to or serve in, either temporarily or otherwise, the public office for which his nomination was rejected.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 1; 2010, ch. 70, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b), substituted “within five (5) legislative working days” for “within five (5) days.”

§ 28-12-103.
Expiration date of appointees' terms.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, effective July 1, 1979, after the expiration of the current term of office of each person appointed by the governor and required to be confirmed by the senate, the next term of that office expires on March 1 during the year of regular expiration. Thereafter, each term, as specified in this section, and each term of office on any board, commission or committee created by the laws of this state after July 1, 1979, and for which senate confirmation is required, expires on March 1 during the year of regular expiration. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the term of an attorney general serving pursuant to W.S. 9-1-601(b) shall terminate as provided by that subsection.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2001, ch. 152, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Apportionment plans for the Wyoming senate and house of representatives, previously published in the Wyoming Statutes Annotated, may now be acquired from the secretary of state. See § 28-2-116(d).

Severability. —

Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 3, reads: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”